Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Incorporation

7-39-201. Application for incorporation — Qualifications of applicants — Resolution — Certificate.

Whenever any number of natural persons, no fewer than three (3), each of whom shall meet any one (1) of the qualifications for an incorporator as set forth in § 7-39-103, files with the governing body of the municipality with respect to which the corporation is proposed to be organized and for the benefit of which the corporation will function, an application in writing seeking permission to apply for the incorporation of an energy acquisition corporation of the municipality, the governing body shall proceed to consider the application.

If the governing body, by appropriate resolution, duly adopted, finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the corporation be formed, and shall authorize the persons making such application to proceed to form a corporation, and shall approve the form of certificate of incorporation proposed to be used in organizing the corporation, then the person making application shall execute, acknowledge and file a certificate of incorporation for the corporation as provided in this part.

No corporation may be formed unless the application has first been filed with the governing body of the municipality and the governing body has adopted a resolution as provided in this section.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-4205; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 3; 1999, ch. 345, § 6.

7-39-202. Requisites of certificate of incorporation — Subscription and acknowledgment.

The certificate of incorporation shall set forth:

The names and residences of the applicants, together with a recital that each of the applicants meets the qualifications for an incorporator as set forth in § 7-39-103;

The name of the corporation;

A recital that permission to organize the corporation has been granted by resolution duly adopted by the governing body of the municipality and the date of the adoption of the resolution;

The location of the principal office of the corporation;

The purposes for which the corporation is proposed to be organized;

The number of directors of the corporation;

The period for the duration of the corporation, if other than perpetual; and

Any other matter that the applicants may choose to insert in the certificate of incorporation, which shall not be inconsistent with this chapter or with the laws of the state of Tennessee; provided, that it shall not be necessary to set forth in the certificate of incorporation the powers enumerated in this chapter.

The certificate of incorporation shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each of the applicants before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-4206; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 4; 1999, ch. 345, § 7.

7-39-203. Approval of certificate by secretary of state — Recording — Beginning of corporate existence.

When executed and acknowledged in conformity with § 7-39-201, the certificate of incorporation shall be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall examine the certificate of incorporation and, if the secretary of state finds that the recitals contained in the certificate of incorporation are correct, that the requirements of § 7-39-201 have been complied with and that the name is not identical with or so nearly similar to that of another corporation already in existence in this state as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall approve the certificate of incorporation and record it in an appropriate book of record in the secretary of state's office.

When the certificate has been so made, filed and approved, the corporate existence shall begin, and the certificate shall be conclusive evidence that the energy acquisition corporation has been formed pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-4207; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 5.

7-39-204. Amendment of certificate.

The certificate of incorporation may, at any time, and from time to time, be amended so as to make any changes in the certificate of incorporation and add any provisions to the certificate of incorporation that might have been included in the original certificate of incorporation.

Any such amendment shall be effected in the following manner:

The members of the board of directors of the corporation shall file with the governing body of the associated municipality an application in writing seeking permission to amend the certificate of incorporation, specifying in such application the amendment proposed to be made.

The governing body shall consider the application and, if it shall, by appropriate resolution, duly find and determine that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the proposed amendment be made and shall authorize the amendment to be made and shall approve the form of the proposed amendment, then the persons making application shall execute an instrument embodying the amendment specified in the application, and shall file the application with the secretary of state.

The proposed amendment shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each member of the board of directors before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds.

The secretary of state shall examine the proposed amendment and, if the secretary of state finds that the requirements of this section have been complied with and the proposed amendment is within the scope of what might be included in an original certificate of incorporation, the secretary of state shall approve the amendment and record it in an appropriate book in the secretary of state's office.

When an amendment has been so made, filed and approved, it shall become effective and the certificate of incorporation shall be amended to the extent provided in the amendment.

No certificate of incorporation shall be amended except in the manner provided in this section.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-4208.